Hawaii statutes.
§338-14.5 Copies of certificate; fees.
The fees for certified copies of birth, marriage, divorce, or death
certificates issued by the department of health shall consist of $10 for the
first copy issued and $4 for each copy issued thereafter. These fees shall be
collected for each single request for certified copies. All fees received for
the issuance of certified copies of birth, marriage, divorce, or death
certificates shall be remitted to the director of health. Upon the receipt of
remittances under this section, the director of health shall deposit:

(1) $1 for each certified copy to the credit of the
spouse and child abuse special account established under section 346-7.5;

(2) $1 for each certified copy to the credit of the
spouse and child abuse special account established under section 601-3.6;

(3) $1 for each certified copy to the credit of the
domestic violence and sexual assault special fund established under section
321-1.3;

(4) $1 for each certified copy to the credit of the
vital statistics improvement special fund established under section 338-14.6;
and

(5) The remainder of the fee for each certified copy
to the credit of the state general fund. [L 1994, c 232, §1; am L 1997, c 216,
§§6, 13; am L 1998, c 311, §7; am L 1999, c 194, §1; am L 2005, c 142, §3]

Note

Distribution of revenues derived from fees; department of
health to submit study to legislature and governor no later than November 1,
2016. L 2016, c 43, §§10, 11.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next